Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1532.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Repeal Section 41-3027.06, Arizona Revised Statutes, is repealed. Sec. 2. Title 41, chapter 27, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 41-3034.01, to read: START_STATUTE41-3034.01. Arizona state schools for the deaf and the blind; termination July 1, 2034 A. The board of directors of the Arizona state schools for the deaf and the blind terminates on July 1, 2034. B. Title 15, chapter 11 and this section are repealed on January 1, 2035. END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Purpose Pursuant to section 41-2955, subsection B, Arizona Revised Statutes, the legislature continues the board of directors of the Arizona state schools for the deaf and the blind to promote and maintain educational opportunities of adequate scope and quality for sensory-impaired children in this state.